Rhode Island, session 2025, SB552.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 11 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL OFFENSES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 71
DISARMING A PEACE OFFICER
11-71-1. Disarming a peace officer.
Any person who shall knowingly remove or attempt to remove a firearm, deadly weapon,
or less-lethal weapon to include, but not limited to, any blunt impact, chemical or conducted energy
device; or knowingly deprive or attempt to deprive the use of a mobile communication device or
radio used in the performance of official duty, from the person of a peace officer as defined in §
12-7-21, or investigator of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to § 42-9-8.1,
shall be deemed to have committed a felony, and shall be imprisoned not less than one year nor
more than five (5) years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001226/SUB A
========